Texas statutes.
CIVIL PRACTICE AND REMEDIES CODE

TITLE 2. TRIAL, JUDGMENT, AND APPEAL

SUBTITLE B. TRIAL MATTERS

CHAPTER 23. JUROR CONTINUANCE

Sec. 23.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Religious organization" means an organization that meets the standards for qualification as a religious organization under Section 11.20, Tax Code.

(2) "Religious holy day" means a day on which the tenets of a religious organization prohibit its members from participating in secular activities, such as court proceedings.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 589, Sec. 5, eff. Aug. 31, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 825, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 23.002. RECESS. (a) If a juror in a civil action is required to appear at a court proceeding on a religious holy day observed by the juror, the court or the court's designee shall recess the civil action until the next day the court is in session after the conclusion of the holy day.

(b) A juror seeking a recess must file with the court before the final selection of the jury an affidavit stating:

(1) the grounds for the recess; and

(2) that the juror holds religious beliefs that prohibit him from taking part in a court proceeding on the day for which the recess is sought.

(c) An affidavit filed under Subsection (b) is proof of the facts stated and need not be corroborated.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 589, Sec. 5, eff. Aug. 31, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 825, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.